Hawaii, session 2026, SB646.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that in recent years, several disturbing incidents have occurred relating to school safety.  In March 2018, a boy at Kipapa elementary school reported that a man approached him in a school restroom and tried to grab his hand.  On December 12, 2019, a police manhunt in Waipahu prompted officials at Waipahu high school and August Ahrens elementary school to place those schools on lockdown.  On February 27, 2020, Ilima intermediate school, Pohakea elementary school, Kaimiloa elementary school, and Campbell high school initiated a lockdown after report of an armed man in Ewa Beach. The legislature further finds that young children often lack the capacity to properly assess and identify the potential dangers posed by the presence of individuals who are not authorized to be present on a school or program's campus.  The legislature recognizes the importance of safety in elementary schools and state prekindergarten programs to ensure that young children can learn in a safe environment.  Accordingly, the State must take action to deter the presence of unauthorized individuals from the premises. The purpose of this Act is to ensure the protection of young children by assigning dedicated security personnel to serve at public elementary schools and state prekindergarten programs by establishing a two-year safety pilot program that assigns school resource officers or guards to serve at public elementary schools and state prekindergarten programs within the Campbell-Kapolei complex area. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part IV, subpart C, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     School safety; school resource officers; guards.  (a) The department shall assign school resource officers or guards registered pursuant to chapter 463 to serve at each public elementary school and state prekindergarten program during hours when students are expected to be on the school campus.  In determining the number of officers or guards that shall be assigned to each public elementary school or state prekindergarten program, the department shall consider: (1)  The size of the school campus; (2)  The number of students in the school or program; and (3)  Other factors relevant to student safety. (b)  The department shall seek federal grants to the extent necessary for the costs relating to the hiring of school resource officers and registered guards." SECTION 3. (a)  The department of education shall: (1)  Establish a two-year pilot program that assigns school resource officers or guards registered pursuant to chapter 463 to serve at public elementary schools and state prekindergarten programs in the Campbell-Kapolei complex area based on the factors as set forth in section 302A-   , Hawaii Revised Statutes; and (2)  Make recommendations based on the pilot program that address student safety at public elementary schools and state prekindergarten programs. (b)  No later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2027 and 2028, the department of education shall submit to the legislature a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026, and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the provision of school resource officers and guards at public elementary schools and state prekindergarten programs under the pilot program established under section 3. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________